Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-823
Bridge and culvert construction; plans and specifications; duplicate copies; filing with county clerk.

The county board shall also file duplicate copies of all plans and specifications adopted by them under the provisions of sections 39-810 to 39-826, in the office of the county clerk, who shall keep the same with the records of his office, to be turned over to his successor in office.

Laws 1905, c. 126, § 16, p. 544;

Laws 1913, c. 88, § 1, p. 232;

R.S.1913, § 2970;

C.S.1922, § 2728;

C.S.1929, § 39-815;

R.S.1943, § 39-823.